North Dakota statutes. TITLE 9 Contracts And Obligations
CHAPTER 9-02 Parties

9-02-01.
Persons capable of contracting.

All persons are capable of contracting except minors and persons of unsound mind.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 872; R.C. 1895, § 3837; R.C. 1899, § 3837; R.C. 1905, § 5282; C.L. 1913, § 5838; R.C. 1943, § 9-0201.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1556.

Cross-References.

Banks’ power to contract, see § 6-03-02.

Corporations, capacity to contract, see § 10-19.1-26, subs. 7.

County, power to contract, see § 11-10-01.

Husband and wife, contracts between, see §§ 14-07-06, 14-07-12 to 14-07-14.

Married person, right to contract, see § 14-07-05.

Minors, capacity to contract, see § 14-10-10.

9-02-02.
Minors and persons of unsound mind.

Minors and persons of unsound mind have only such capacity as is specified in statutes relating to such persons.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 873; R.C. 1895, § 3838; R.C. 1899, § 3838; R.C. 1905, § 5283; C.L. 1913, § 5839; R.C. 1943, § 9-0202.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1557.

Cross-References.

Disaffirmation of contract by minor, see §§ 14-10-11 to 14-10-13.

Person without understanding, contract rights, see § 14-01-01.

Insane person’s contracts, see § 14-01-03.

Minor’s contracts, see § 14-10-10.

Minor’s disability to delegate power and to contract relating to real property, see § 14-10-09.

Partial incapacity contracts, rescission, see § 14-01-02.

9-02-03.
Identity of parties essential to validity.

It is essential to the validity of the contract, not only that the parties should exist, but that it should be possible to identify them.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 874; R.C. 1895, § 3839; R.C. 1899, § 3839; R.C. 1905, § 5284; C.L. 1913, § 5840; R.C. 1943, § 9-0203.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1558.

9-02-04.
Third-party beneficiary may enforce contract.

A contract made expressly for the benefit of a third person may be enforced by that person at any time before the parties thereto rescind it.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 875; R.C. 1895, § 3840; R.C. 1899, § 3840; R.C. 1905, § 5285; C.L. 1913, § 5841; R.C. 1943, § 9-0204.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1559.